Montana, session 2025, LC1705.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Secretary of state to post lien information -- agriculture, forestry,
construction dealer lien information. (1) For a lien filed with the secretary of state under this chapter on
equipment used in the agriculture, forestry, and construction industries, the secretary of state shall publish
information relating to the lien in a format that is accessible to the public, including publishing the information on
the secretary of state's website. The secretary of state shall, at a minimum, publish information relating to the
lien that identifies:
(a) the make, model, and serial number of the equipment; and
(b) the name of the producer, farm, ranch, or other entity and the lender who has a lien on the
equipment of the producer, farm, ranch, or other entity.
(2) This section applies to equipment used in the agriculture, forestry, and construction industries
and includes but is not limited to:
(a) implements of husbandry as defined in 61-1-101;
(b) construction equipment as defined in 61-10-102; and
(c) forestry equipment.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 71, chapter 3, part 1, and the provisions of Title 71, chapter 3, part 1, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****